Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 3. Highway Safety Patrol

§ 45-3-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter and Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, may be cited as the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8076; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 45-3-3.
Definitions.

The following words when used in this chapter shall, for the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section:

The term “commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety of this state;

The term “highway” means every way or place of whatever nature open to the use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel, and shall include streets of municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8077; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 45-3-5.
Chief of patrol.

The commissioner is empowered and authorized to appoint an Assistant Commissioner of Public Safety to be known as the chief of patrol, who shall have the qualifications set forth in Section 45-3-9, and shall have charge of the division of operations of the patrol. The annual salary of the chief of patrol shall be fixed by the Legislature, payable monthly. He shall execute a bond in the penal sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) with a surety company authorized to do business in this state, the bond to be conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties. The bond shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8078; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 404; Laws, 1952, ch. 356; Laws, 1958, ch. 320; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 33; Laws, 2011, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2011.).

§ 45-3-7.
Organization of Highway Safety Patrol; compensation of members.

The commissioner is authorized to employ not exceeding six hundred fifty (650) persons as a Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol within the Department of Public Safety. All positions and salaries heretofore authorized and set by statute under the commissioner shall after April 20, 1981, be made part of the State Personnel System and shall be governed by the laws, rules and regulations thereof.

The commissioner shall grant an additional One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month for special flying assignments to patrol officers who are licensed commercial pilots.

It is the direction of the Legislature that all Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) nonexempt sworn officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol who are working one hundred seventy-one (171) hours in a twenty-eight-day work cycle be compensated based on the annual salary established by the State Personnel Board for a one-hundred-sixty-hour per month schedule divided by two thousand eighty-seven and one hundred forty-three one thousandths (2,087.143), for an hourly rate, to be multiplied by two thousand two hundred twenty-three (2,223) or one hundred seventy-one (171) hours in a twenty-eight-day work cycle for a new annual salary. All hours worked over one hundred seventy-one (171) hours in a twenty-eight-day schedule shall be governed by the FLSA or other special compensation plan. All realignments after July 1, 2010, shall be calculated using this formula. This subsection shall be known as the “David R. Huggins Act.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8079; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 515; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 9; Laws, 1966, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 482; Laws, 1971, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 488; Laws, 1981, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 551, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 45-3-9.
Qualifications of members of Highway Safety Patrol; agents of Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics employed as enforcement troopers.

The chief of patrol, directors, inspectors, assistant inspectors, patrol officers and investigators of the department shall be selected after an examination as to physical and mental fitness, knowledge of traffic laws, rules and regulations of this state, the laws of the state pertaining to arrest, and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and Public Service Commission, such examination to be prescribed by the commissioner. At the time of appointment they shall be citizens of the United States and the State of Mississippi, of good moral character, and shall be not less than twenty-one (21) years of age and shall have:

Sixty (60) hours and/or an associate degree from an accredited educational institution with a minimum grade point average of 2.0 on a 4.0 scale; or

A high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma and at least four (4) years of active military duty or six (6) years of National Guard duty; a Department of Defense Form 214 (DD214), Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, or a National Guard Bureau Form 22 (NGB Form 22), Report of Separation, or a National Guard Bureau Form 23 (NGB Form 23), ARNG Retirement Credit Points Statement must be submitted by the applicant; or

A high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma, minimum standard certification from an accredited law enforcement academy and a minimum of one (1) year of law enforcement field experience; or

A high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma if the applicant is not less than twenty-three (23) years of age.

Sworn agents of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics who are employed as enforcement troopers shall retain all compensatory, personal and sick leave accrued pursuant to Sections 25-3-92, 25-3-93 and 25-3-95.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8079, 8086; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 377 § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 515; Laws, 1962, ch. 516; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 9; Laws, 1964, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 482; Laws, 1971, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 561, § 21; Laws, 1981, ch. 511, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 518, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 550, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 561, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 398, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 45-3-11.
Prohibitions as to engaging in political activity and soliciting campaign contributions.

No member of the patrol shall, while in such position, be a candidate for any political office or take part in or contribute any money or other things of value, directly or indirectly, to any political campaign or to any candidate for public office. Anyone violating this provision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon final conviction shall be punished as provided by law, and shall be dismissed from the patrol.

It shall be unlawful for any person to solicit or attempt to solicit any money or thing of value from any employee of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol for political purposes. Any person violating this provision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon final conviction shall be punished as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8079; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 515; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 9; Laws, 1966, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 482; Laws, 1971, ch. 518, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 45-3-13.
No exemption from military service for patrolmen.

No patrolman shall be exempt from military service because of appointment to the highway safety patrol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8079-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2.

§ 45-3-15.
Preference to returning veterans.

All patrolmen who have been or are called to the armed services shall be given preference in employment upon their return.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8080; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 3.

§ 45-3-17.
Dismissal of patrolmen.

During the period of the first twelve (12) months after appointment, any member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be subject to dismissal at the will of the commissioner. After twelve (12) months’ service, no member of the patrol shall be subject to dismissal or otherwise have his salary adversely affected except for cause, and any such action against an officer of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be subject to and proceed under the laws, rules and regulations of the state personnel system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8081; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1981, ch. 511, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1981).

§ 45-3-19.
Regulations governing discipline, uniforms, supplies, and the like.

The commissioner shall have authority, with the approval of the Governor, to make needful and proper rules and regulations governing the proper discipline of the members of the patrol, of selecting, designing and effecting an appropriate uniform therefor, and prescribing outfits and equipment and supplies necessary and proper to carry out the objects of this chapter. The commissioner shall provide the same as well as such weapons, vehicles and equipment as shall be necessary and proper and shall be responsible therefor. The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall, from time to time, establish headquarters and substations, as he shall deem it advisable for the objects and purposes of such an organization and for the enforcement of the laws, rules and regulations hereinabove provided, and to that end he may, with the approval of the Governor acquire the right to use lands and buildings for the accommodation of members of said organization and properties and equipment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8087; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1944, ch. 331, § 2.

§ 45-3-21.
Powers and duties of patrol, generally.

The powers and duties of the Highway Safety Patrol shall be, in addition to all others prescribed by law, as follows:

To enforce all of the traffic laws, rules and regulations of the State of Mississippi upon all highways of the state highway system and the rights-of-way of such highways; provided, however, that if any person commits an offense upon the state highway system and be pursued by a member of the Highway Safety Patrol, such patrol officer may pursue and apprehend such offender upon any of the highways or public roads of this state, or to any other place to which such offender may flee.

To enforce all rules and regulations of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to legal authority.

When so directed by the Governor, to enforce any of the laws of this state upon any of the highways or public roads thereof.

Upon the request of the State Tax Commission, and with the approval of the Governor, to enforce all of the provisions of law with reference to the registration, license and taxation of vehicles using the highways of this state, and relative to the sizes, weights and load limits of such vehicles, and to enforce the provisions of all other laws administered by the State Tax Commission upon any of the highways or public roads of this state; and for such purpose the Highway Safety Patrol shall have the authority to collect and receive all taxes which may be due under any of such laws, and to report and remit same to the State Tax Commission in the manner required by law, or the rules and regulations of the commission.

Upon request of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and when so instructed by the commissioner, to aid and assist in the enforcement of all laws which such agencies are authorized or required to enforce, and in the enforcement of the rules and regulations of such agencies, including the Mississippi Motor Carrier Regulatory Law of 1938 and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

To arrest without warrant any person or persons committing or attempting to commit any misdemeanor, felony or breach of the peace within their presence or view, and to pursue and so arrest any person committing such an offense to and at any place in the State of Mississippi where he may go or be. Nothing herein shall be construed as granting the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol general police powers.

To aid and assist any law enforcement officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy. Additionally, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may arrest without warrant any fugitive from justice who has escaped or who is using the highways of the state in an attempt to flee. With the approval of the commissioner or his designee, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may assist other law enforcement agencies in manhunts for convicted felons who have escaped and/or for alleged felons where there is probable cause to believe that the person being sought committed the felony and a felony had actually been committed.

To cooperate with the State Forest Service by reporting all forest fires.

Upon request of the sheriff or his designee, or board of supervisors of any county or the chief of police or mayor of any municipality, and when so instructed by the commissioner or his designee, to respond to calls for assistance in a law enforcement incident; such request and action shall be noted and clearly reflected on the radio logs of both the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol district substation and that of the requesting agency, entered on the local NCIC terminal, if available, and a request in writing shall follow within forty-eight (48) hours. Additionally, the time of commencement and termination of the specific law enforcement incident shall be clearly noted on the radio logs of both law enforcement agencies.

The Legislature declares that the primary law enforcement officer in any county in the State of Mississippi is the duly qualified and elected sheriff thereof, but for the purposes of this subsection there is hereby vested in the Department of Public Safety, in addition to the powers hereinabove mentioned and the other provisions of this section under the terms and limitations hereinafter mentioned and for the purpose of insuring domestic tranquility and for the purpose of preventing or suppressing, or both, crimes of violence, acts and conduct calculated to, or which may, provoke or lead to violence and/or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, a breach of the peace, and acts of intimidation or terror, the powers and duties to include the enforcement of all the laws of the State of Mississippi relating to such purposes, to investigate any violation of the laws of the State of Mississippi and to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with violating the laws of the State of Mississippi which relate to such purposes. Investigators of the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety shall have general police powers to enforce all the laws of the State of Mississippi. All officers of the Department of Public Safety charged with the enforcement of the laws administered by that agency, for the purposes herein set forth, shall have full power to investigate, prevent, apprehend and arrest law violators anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of general police officers in the performance of their duties. The officers of the Department of Public Safety are authorized and empowered to carry and use firearms and other weapons deemed necessary in the discharge of their duties as such and are also empowered to serve warrants and subpoenas issued under the authority of the State of Mississippi. The Governor shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to persons aiding in the investigation, apprehension and conviction of persons charged with acts of violence, or threats of violence or intimidation or acts of terrorism. The additional powers herein granted to or vested in the Department of Public Safety or any of its officers or employees by this section, excepting investigating powers, and those powers of investigators who shall have general police power, being the investigators in the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, shall not be exercised by the Department of Public Safety, or any of its officers or employees, except upon authority and direction of the Governor or Acting Governor, by proclamation duly signed, in the following instances, to wit:

When requested by the sheriff or board of supervisors of any county or the mayor of any municipality on the grounds that mob violence, crimes of violence, acts and conduct of terrorism, riots or acts of intimidation, or either, calculated to or which may provoke violence or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, violence, or lead to any breach of the peace, or either, and acts of intimidation or terror are anticipated, and when such acts or conduct in the opinion of the Governor or Acting Governor would provoke violence or any of the foregoing acts or conduct set out in this subsection, and the sheriff or mayor, as the case may be, lacks adequate police force to prevent or suppress the same.

Acting upon evidence submitted to him by the Department of Public Safety, or other investigating agency authorized by the Governor or Acting Governor to make such investigations, because of the failure or refusal of the sheriff of any county or mayor of any municipality to take action or employ such means at his disposal, to prevent or suppress the acts, conduct or offenses provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Governor or Acting Governor deems it necessary to invoke the powers and authority vested in the Department of Public Safety.

The Governor or Acting Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to issue his proclamation invoking the powers and authority vested by this paragraph, as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, and when the Governor or Acting Governor issues said proclamation in accordance herewith, said proclamation shall become effective upon the signing thereof and shall continue in full force and effect for a period of ninety (90) days, or for a shorter period if otherwise ordered by the Governor or Acting Governor. At the signing of the proclamation by the Governor or Acting Governor, the Department of Public Safety and its officers and employees shall thereupon be authorized to exercise the additional power and authority vested in them by this paragraph. The Governor and Acting Governor may issue additional proclamations for periods of ninety (90) days each under the authority of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2).

All proclamations issued by the Governor or Acting Governor shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State on the next succeeding business day.

It is not the intention of this section to vest the wide powers and authority herein provided for, as general powers of the Department of Public Safety, and the same are not hereby so vested, but to limit these general powers to cases and incidents wherein it is deemed necessary to prevent or suppress the offenses and conditions herein mentioned in this and other subsections of this section, and under the terms and conditions hereinabove enumerated, it being the sense of the Legislature that the prime duties of the Department of Public Safety are to patrol the highways of this state and enforce the highway safety laws.

Patrol officers shall have no interest in any costs in the prosecution of any case through any court; nor shall any patrol officer receive any fee as a witness in any court held in this state, whether a state or federal court.

Provided, however, that the general police power vested by virtue of the terms of subsection (2) of this section is solely for the purposes set out in said subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8082, 8082-01; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 4; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 10; Laws, 1968, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 337; Laws, 1980, ch. 527; Laws, 1984, ch. 350; Laws, 1986, ch. 310; Laws, 1988, ch. 520; Laws, 1991, ch. 589, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 498, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-3-23.
Commissioner not to impose rule which impedes enforcement of traffic laws.

It shall be unlawful for the commissioner to impose any rule of limitation of daily mileage travel or any other rule which will impede highway patrolmen from effectively enforcing the traffic laws in their jurisdiction of assignment. The commissioner will insure that patrolmen spend the maximum amount of their daily work schedule within the highway rights-of-way as a deterrent to traffic violations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8079; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 515; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 9; Laws, 1966, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 482; Laws, 1971, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 45-3-25.
Patrolman preferring traffic charge to forward abstract of court record.

Whenever any patrolman shall prefer any traffic charge whatsoever against any person in any court, it shall be the duty of such patrolman, upon the termination of such proceeding, to mail two (2) copies of the abstract of the court record immediately to the Commissioner of Public Safety at Jackson, Mississippi, showing the nature of the charge preferred, the date of the trial upon such charge, the disposition of the matter by the court and the sentence, if any, imposed by the court. Such abstract shall be signed by the presiding judge of the court in which the charge was preferred. Upon receipt of such abstracts, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to retain a copy for the use of, and inspection by, the State Auditor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8082-11; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 12; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 11; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 45-3-27.
Bearing of arms; compliance with dress regulations.

Members of the highway safety patrol shall be entitled to bear arms in the discharge of their duties. Said members shall, while in the discharge of their duties, wear such dress, uniform, and insignia, and carry such credentials as shall be prescribed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8088; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1964).

§ 45-3-29.
Penalty for impersonating patrolman; exception for county patrolman; exception for retired patrolman with prior authorization from commissioner.

Except as otherwise authorized under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person not authorized so to do to impersonate a state highway safety patrolman, wear or use the insignia or uniform thereof, or to in anywise imitate or impersonate such patrolman. Any person adjudged guilty of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail, where such offense is committed, for a term not exceeding one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to prevent or preclude the boards of supervisors of the several counties from employing county highway patrolmen as presently authorized by law, and said county patrolmen shall, when authorized by the commissioner and under rules and regulations with respect thereto, after completing such examinations and meeting such requirements as are specified by the commissioner, be entitled to wear the uniform and insignia of state highway safety patrolmen and discharge the duties thereof.

It shall not be unlawful or a violation of this section for a retired State Highway Safety Patrol officer to wear the uniform and insignia of the State Highway Safety Patrol when making presentations, delivering speeches or addressing public or private audiences for the purpose of entertaining or amusing such audiences provided such retired officer obtains written authorization from the Commissioner of Public Safety before engaging in such events. The approval of the commissioner shall not be required for each separate event but shall remain effective as an authorization for all such events until revoked or rescinded by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8088; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1964, ch. 324, § 12; Laws, 2000, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 45-3-31.
Uniforms, automobiles and other equipment.

The commissioner is authorized to purchase (a) uniforms for the members of the highway safety patrol at a price not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) each, (b) automobiles, motorcycles and other equipment necessary for the efficient operation of the highway safety patrol, but the number of passenger automobiles purchased, owned or operated by the highway safety patrol shall not exceed the number set forth in Section 25-1-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, and (c) identification equipment in a sum of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The commissioner is further authorized to purchase or lease necessary equipment for two-way radio sub and booster stations, and he may equip each of the patrol automobiles with sending and receiving radios, of a type to be selected by him, within the limits of any appropriation made therefor. The commissioner may trade in used equipment on the purchase of new equipment or other materials.

The commissioner shall allow and furnish to each patrolman at least two (2) complete uniforms per year. The commissioner shall keep all automobiles, motorcycles and other equipment in good state of repair and pay the expenses incident thereto, and he is authorized to pay the expenses of maintaining and operating necessary equipment for two-way radio sub and booster stations purchased or leased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8083; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 5; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 3, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-3-33.
Uniforms, automobiles and other equipment; advertising for bids.

Except as is otherwise provided in Section 25-1-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, the commissioner shall, before buying any equipment or other materials where the amount is in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), advertise in at least one (1) newspaper published in the city of Jackson, his intention of buying such materials or equipment (and, if such be the case, his intention to trade in any used equipment on the purchase price of said materials or equipment) by at least one (1) publication in such paper at least ten (10) days before the equipment or materials shall be purchased, and shall receive bids thereupon. In advertising for bids for automobiles and motorcycles, the commissioner shall have the authority to specify the make and model desired. Said equipment or materials shall be purchased from such persons, firms or corporations submitting the best and lowest bid for the particular class of equipment or materials desired. In the case of purchasing automobiles or motorcycles, there shall be at least two (2) bids submitted for each type desired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8083; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 5; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 3, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-3-35.
Camera equipment for patrol cars.

The commissioner of public safety is hereby authorized to procure and equip, in addition to any other equipment required, each patrol car used in the patrolling of the highways of this state, with a suitable camera equipped for making flashlight photographs either during the day time or night time. The cost of each such camera shall not exceed the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Before making purchase hereof the commissioner of public safety shall advertise his intention of buying same by one publication in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the State of Mississippi, at least ten (10) days before the purchase of such equipment, which advertisement shall distinctly describe the articles to be purchased and shall receive sealed bids thereon, which shall be opened in public at a time and place to be specified in the advertisement. In addition to the purchase of the necessary cameras the commissioner is authorized to purchase all necessary films, developing equipment, and other supplies necessary for the development of negatives for the production of the finished photograph. Such additional supplies shall be purchased from the person, firm, or corporation submitting the lowest and best bid for the particular camera and other supplies desired. The commissioner reserves the right to reject any and all bids submitted.

Every patrolman who shall be required to use a camera in the performance of his official duties shall be adequately trained and instructed as to the proper use of the equipment before attempting to make photographs.

The commissioner is authorized to employ not exceeding two (2) persons at a salary not to exceed an average of Two Hundred and Twenty Dollars ($220.00) per month for use in developing and perfecting photographs taken.

All negatives of any official picture taken and at least one (1) copy of each finished photograph of each such negative shall be properly identified and filed as a part of the records of the office of the commissioner of public safety.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-17; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 25; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 6; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 4.

§ 45-3-37.
Markings on patrol cars.

The state patrol insignia shall be placed on each door of all cars used patrolling the highways and, in addition, such cars may have such other distinguishing markings as the commissioner of public safety shall deem proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8083; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 5; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-3-39.
Prohibition as to personal use of cars, materials and equipment.

No state officer or other person shall utilize at any time any uniform, car, material or equipment of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol for his personal use or for private purposes except in an emergency, and except to the extent authorized by Section 25-1-85, Mississippi Code of 1972. A breach of this provision shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or thirty (30) days in jail, or both. Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to apply to the Governor or Lieutenant Governor of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8083, 8085; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 2; ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, §§ 2, 3, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-3-41.
Radio receiving sets may be installed in certain counties and municipalities.

Any county or municipality now or hereafter having a twenty-four (24) hour law enforcement system is hereby authorized by an order duly entered upon the minutes of such governing authority thereof to request the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol to purchase and install in some permanent office provided therefor a proper and suitable radio receiving set, subject to the approval of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol.

The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall, upon the receipt of such request by any such municipality or county, purchase and install in such county or municipality in a building provided by such county or municipality a proper and suitable radio receiving set, which shall be tuned or adjusted in order to receive broadcasts from the radio station or stations operated by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol. The county or municipality making such request when such receiving set is duly installed shall reimburse the state highway patrol for all sums paid out in the purchase price of such set.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 324, §§ 1, 2.

§ 45-3-43.
Radio substations and booster stations for use of highway safety patrol.

The board of supervisors of any county and the mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing body of any municipality, are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to construct and erect radio substations and booster stations for the use of the highway safety patrol, to install therein suitable and necessary radio receiving and transmitting equipment, and to appropriate funds for such purposes from the general county or municipal fund, as the case may be.

In the purchase and installation of such radio transmitting and receiving equipment the said board of supervisors or governing authority may authorize the commissioner of public safety to make the purchase and installation thereon on behalf of the county or municipality, as the case may be, and may pay the cost of such purchase and installation out of the county or municipal general fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 344, § 1.

§ 45-3-45.
Training school for patrolmen.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to set up a training school for patrolmen. He shall prescribe the rules and regulations for the operation of same and the period of training to be required of appointees to the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol. However, the period of training for recruits shall not be less than eighty (80) days. The expense of such training shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses of the patrol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8086; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1962, ch. 516; Laws, 1964, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2002.).

§ 45-3-47.
Training school for patrolmen; selection program.

The selection program for such training school shall consist of application, examination, investigation and interview:

Application.— The commissioner shall prescribe an application that shall contain a case history of the applicant, fingerprints, picture of the applicant, certified copies of birth certificate and transcript of school records. Said application may include certified copies of any discharge from the services of the United States government.

Examination.— The commissioner shall adopt a standardized test for applicants and each shall be required to take the prescribed examination on a competitive basis. The commissioner shall further require a physical examination by a staff of competent doctors to determine that each applicant selected is in good physical condition, including height-weight ratio as recommended by the United States Air Force, with no deformities.

Investigation.— The commissioner shall require an investigation of each applicant to determine that he or she is of good moral character, between the ages of twenty-three (23) and thirty-two (32), that he or she has completed a high school education, and that he or she is honest, reliable, loyal and above reproach.

Interview.— The commissioner shall require an interview of each applicant considered for patrol service to be conducted and may require an interview with his family if necessary to determine that the applicant fulfills the requirements as prescribed in paragraph (c), as well as any other rules and regulations that may be prescribed. The commissioner may at his discretion require the services of psychiatrists, doctors, police officers or other professional people in conducting such interviews.

Before any person may be selected to attend a school or be appointed as a member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, the applicant must fulfill all the requirements as prescribed in this section and meet the standards prescribed in this section and meet the standards prescribed by the department, and may be required to submit to a polygraph examination in connection with the employment application.

All applications, birth certificates, transcripts and other records submitted by an applicant shall become the property of the State of Mississippi and the department of public safety, shall be held confidential and shall not be discoverable by judicial process. Such records may be destroyed after five (5) years from the time of application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8086; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1962, ch. 516; Laws, 1964, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 511, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1981).

§ 45-3-49.
Penalty for violating provisions of chapter.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any of the provisions of this chapter unless such violation is declared by such law or other law of this state to be a felony.

Unless another penalty is provided in this chapter or by the laws of this state, every person convicted of a misdemeanor for the violation of any provision of this chapter shall be punished by fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8089; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 45-3-51.
Retirants or beneficiaries of officers killed in line of duty permitted to retain one sidearm.

Each member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol or agent of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics who retires under the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System or the Public Employees’ Retirement System, for superannuation or for reason of disability or a beneficiary of such member of the Highway Safety Patrol or agent of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics who is killed in the line of duty shall be allowed to retain, as his personal property, one (1) sidearm which was issued under authority of Section 45-3-19 or 41-29-159. Likewise, a beneficiary of any law enforcement officer killed in the line of duty shall be allowed to retain the officer’s sidearm.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 358; Laws, 1999, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 550, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 28, 2010.).

§ 45-3-52.
Retention by officers of assigned dogs retired from service.

A member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol or any other certified law enforcement officer shall be allowed to retain as his personal property any dog assigned to such member when the dog is retired from service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 491, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.